Utah statutes.
47-2-5.   Elimination by the county legislative body -- Method -- Sale.

A policy for the manner and method of eliminating abandoned horses from the open range shall be in the discretion of the county legislative body, and it shall be its duty to so eliminate abandoned horses, using the means most effective and economical under the circumstances. The county executive may sell all captured horses.

